Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4140.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1705, as
last amended by Section 247, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 1705), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1705. A. Grand larceny is a felony punishable as
follows:
1. If the value of the property is less than One Thousand
Dollars ($1,000.00), the person shall be punished by imprisonment in
the county jail for a term not to exceed one (1) year or by
incarceration in the county jail for one or more nights or weekends
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4140 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

purs uant to Section 991a-2 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes, at
the option of the court, or by a fine not to exceed One Thousand
Dollars ($1,000.00), or by both such imprisonment and fine;
2. If the property is one or more firearms, the property is
taken from the person of another, or the value of the property is
One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or more but less than Two Thousand
Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00), the person shall be guilty of a
Class D3 felony offense and shall be punished by imprisonment as
provided for in subsections B through F of Section 20P of this
title, or by a fine not to exceed Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars
($2,500.00), or by both such imprisonment and fine;
3. In the event the value of the property is Two Thousand Five
Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) or more but less than Fifteen Thousand
Dollars ($15,000.00), the person shall be guilty of a Class D1
felony offense and shall be punished by imprisonment as provided for
in subsections B through F of Section 20N of this title, or by a
fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or by both such
imprisonment and fine; or
4. If the property is one or more firearms or the value of the
property is Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or more, the
person shall be guilty of a Class C2 felony offense and shall be
punished by imprisonment as provided for in subsections B through F
of Section 20M of this title, or by a fine not to exceed One
Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or by both such imprisonment and fine.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4140 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

B. The person shall also be ordered to pay restitution to the
victim as provided in Section 991f of Title 22 of the Oklahoma
Statutes.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1713, as
amended by Section 249, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 1713), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1713. A. Every person who buys or receives, in any
manner, upon any consideration, personal property of a value of One
Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or more that has been stolen,
embezzled, obtained by false pretense or robbery, knowing or having
reasonable cause to believe the same to have been stolen, embezzled,
obtained by false pretense, or robbery, or who conceals, withholds,
or aids in concealing or withholding such property from the owner
shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a felony punishable as follows:
1. If the value of the personal property is One Thousand
Dollars ($1,000.00) or more but less than Two Thousand Five Hundred
Dollars ($2,500.00), the person shall be guilty of a Class D3 felony
offense and shall be punished by imprisonment as provided for in
subsections B through F of Section 20P of this title, or by a fine
not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or by both such fine
and imprisonment;
2. If the value of the personal property is Two Thousand Five
Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00) or more but less than Fifteen Thousand
Dollars ($15,000.00), the person shall be guilty of a Class D1
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4140 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

felo ny offense and shall be punished by imprisonment as provided for
in subsections B through F of Section 20N of this title, or by a
fine not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or by both such
fine and imprisonment; or
3. If the property is one or more firearms or the value of the
personal property is Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or more,
the person shall be guilty of a Class C2 felony offense and shall be
punished by imprisonment as provided for in subsections B through F
of Section 20M of this title, or by a fine not to exceed Five
Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or by both such imprisonment and fine.
B. If the personal property that has been stolen, embezzled,
obtained by false pretense or robbery has a value of less than One
Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), the person shall, upon conviction, be
guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county
jail for a term not to exceed six (6) months.
C. Every person who, without making reasonable inquiry, buys,
receives, conceals, withholds, or aids in concealing or withholding
any property which has been stolen, embezzled, obtained by false
pretense or robbery, or otherwise feloniously obtained, under such
circumstances as should cause such person to make reasonable inquiry
to ascertain that the person from whom such property was bought or
received had the legal right to sell or deliver it shall be presumed
to have bought or received such property knowing it to have been so

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4140 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

stol en or wrongfully obtained. This presumption may, however, be
rebutted by proof.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON JUDICIARY
April 14, 2026 - DO PASS




















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB4140 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)